Utah statutes.
17C-3-109.   Amending an economic development project area plan.
(1)  An adopted economic development project area plan may be amended as
provided in this section.
(2)  If an agency proposes to amend an adopted economic development project
area plan to enlarge the project area:
(a)  the requirements under this part that apply to adopting a project area
plan apply equally to the proposed amendment as if it were a proposed project
area plan;
(b)  the base year taxable value for the new area added to the project area
shall be determined under Subsection 17C-1-102(6)(a)(ii) using the date of the
taxing entity committee's consent referred to in Subsection (2)(c); and
(c)  the agency shall obtain the consent of the taxing entity committee before
the agency may collect tax increment from the area added to the project area
by the amendment.
(3)  If a proposed amendment does not propose to enlarge an economic
development  project area, an agency board may adopt a resolution approving an
amendment to an adopted project area plan after:
(a)  the agency gives notice, as provided in Section 17C-3-402, of the
proposed amendment and of the public hearing required by Subsection (3)(b);
(b)  the agency board holds a public hearing on the proposed amendment that
meets the requirements of a plan hearing;
(c)  the agency obtains the taxing entity committee's consent to the
amendment, if the amendment proposes:
(i)  to enlarge the area within the project area from which tax increment is
collected; or
(ii)  to permit the agency to receive a greater percentage of tax increment or
to receive tax increment for a longer period of time than allowed under the
adopted project area plan; and
(d)  the agency obtains the consent of the legislative body or governing board
of each taxing entity affected, if the amendment proposes to permit the agency
to receive, from less than all taxing entities, a greater percentage of tax
increment or to receive tax increment for a longer period of time, or both,
than allowed under the adopted project area plan.
(4) (a)  An adopted project area plan may be amended without complying with
the notice and public hearing requirements of Subsections (2)(a) and (3)(a)
and (b) and without obtaining taxing entity committee approval under
Subsection (3)(c) if the amendment:
(i)  makes a minor adjustment in the legal description of a project area
boundary requested by a county assessor or county auditor to avoid
inconsistent property boundary lines; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (4)(b), removes a parcel of real property from a
project area because the agency determines that inclusion of the parcel is no
longer necessary or desirable to the project area.
(b)  An amendment removing a parcel of real property from a project area under
Subsection (4)(a) may not be made without the consent of the record property
owner of the parcel being removed.
(5) (a)  An amendment approved by board resolution under this section may not
take effect until adopted by ordinance of the legislative body of the
community in which the project area that is the subject of the project area
plan being amended is located.
(b)  Upon a community legislative body passing an ordinance adopting an
amendment to a project area plan, the agency whose project area plan was
amended shall comply with the requirements of Section 17C-3-108 to the same
extent as if the amendment were a project area plan.
